Utah statutes.
34-32-1.   Assignments to labor unions -- Effect.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Employee" means a person employed by any person, partnership, public,
private, or municipal corporation, school district, the state, or any
political subdivision of the state.
(b)  "Employer" means the person or entity employing an employee.
(c) (i)  "Labor organization" means a lawful organization of any kind that is
composed, in whole or in part, of employees, and that exists for the purpose,
in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor
disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or other terms and
conditions of employment.
(ii)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c)(iii), "labor organization"
includes each employee association and union for employees of public and
private sector employers.
(iii)  "Labor organization" does not include organizations governed by the
National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq. or the Railroad Labor
Act, 45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.
(d)  "Union dues" means dues, fees, monies, or other assessments required as a
condition of membership or participation in a labor organization.
(2) (a)  An employee may direct, in writing, that an employer deduct from the
employee's wages a specified sum for union dues, not to exceed 3% per month,
to be paid to a labor organization designated by the employee.
(b)  An employer shall cease making deductions for union dues from the wages
of an employee for the benefit of a labor organization when the employer
receives a written communication from the employee directing that the
deductions cease.
